District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1204.02

Appointment of Director.

Repealed.

May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-268, § 3, 62 DCR 1549
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2073, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-268, see § 2073 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).